transducers/ckt_full/verb.lexd
PATTERNS
IntransitiveVerb
TransitiveVerb

PATTERN IntransitiveVerb
:IV(2) VerbalStem[-tv] [<v><iv>:] IV(1): :IV(3)

PATTERN TransitiveVerb
:TV(2) VerbalStem[-iv] [<v><tv>:] TV(1): :TV(3)

PATTERN VerbalStem
Ints? Ints2? DesidVerbalStem Iter? Coll? Dur? InchCompl?

PATTERN DesidVerbalStem
Desid(1) ApVerbalStem Desid(2)
ApVerbalStem

PATTERN ApVerbalStem
Ap(1) Cs? DerivableVerbStem Ap(2)
Cs? DerivableVerbStem

PATTERN DerivableVerbStem
VerbStem Th?
Nouns [[iv]:[iv]] [<consume>:>у] Th?
Nouns [<utilitiv>:>{ы}тку] Th?
[:те>] Nouns [<create>[iv]:>ӈ{⁺ⱽᴴ}a] Th?
(Nouns|VerbStem) [<rev>:>{ы}тв] Th?
DerivedNouns [[iv]:[iv]] Th
DerivedNouns [[tv]:[tv]] Th
DerivedNouns [<incorp>+[iv]:>{ы}[iv]] VerbStem Th?

LEXICON Approx
<approx>:м{Æ}ч{ы}>

LEXICON Ints
<ints>:т{Æ}{N}{ы}>

LEXICON Ints2
<ints2>:ԓ{ы}ги>

LEXICON Desid(2)
<desid>:р{Æ}> <desid>:>ӈ

LEXICON Ap(2)
<ap>:ин{Æ}> <ap2>:>тку

LEXICON Cs
<caus>:{R}{ы}>

LEXICON Th
<th>:>{Æ}т
<th>:>{Æ}в
<th>:>{Æ}{Æ}
<th>:>ъ{Æ}

LEXICON Iter
<iter>:>{ы}тку

LEXICON Coll
<coop_s>:>{ы}ръу
<coop_o>:>{ы}йв

LEXICON Dur
<dur>:>{ы}ԓъ{Æ}т

LEXICON InchCompl
<inch>:>{ы}мго
<inch2>:>{ы}ӈӈо
<inch2>:>{ы}мго
<compl>:>{ы}пԓытку

LEXICON IV(3)
<neut><aor><s_sg1>      т{ы}>    >{ы}к
<neut><aor><s_pl1>      мыт{ы}>  >{ы}мык
<neut><aor><s_sg2>      :        >и
<neut><aor><s_pl2>      :        >{ы}тык
<neut><aor><s_sg3>      :        >и
<neut><aor><s_pl3>      :        >{ы}т

<neut><aor><s_sg1><th>  т{ы}>    >{ы}гъ{Æ}к
<neut><aor><s_sg2><th>  :        >{ы}гъи
<neut><aor><s_sg3><th>  :        >{ы}гъи
<neut><aor><s_pl3><th>  :        >{ы}гъ{Æ}т

<neut><fut><s_sg1>      т{ы}>р{Æ}>   >{ы}к
<neut><fut><s_pl1>      мыт{ы}>р{Æ}> >{ы}мык
<neut><fut><s_sg2>      >р{Æ}>       >и
<neut><fut><s_pl2>      >р{Æ}>       >{ы}тык
<neut><fut><s_sg3>      >р{Æ}>       >и
<neut><fut><s_pl3>      >р{Æ}>       >{ы}т

<neut><fut><s_sg1>      т{ы}>р{Æ}>   >{ы}гъ{Æ}
<neut><fut><s_pl1>      мыт{ы}>р{Æ}> >{ы}гъ{Æ}
<neut><fut><s_sg2>      >р{Æ}>       >{ы}гъ{Æ}
<neut><fut><s_sg3>      >р{Æ}>       >{ы}гъ{Æ}

<neut><intn><s_sg1>     м{ы}>        >{ы}к
<neut><intn><s_pl1>     мын{ы}>      >{ы}мык
<neut><intn><s_sg2>     ӄ{ы}>        >{ы}ги
<neut><intn><s_pl2>     ӄ{ы}>        >{ы}тык
<neut><intn><s_sg3>     н{ы}>        >{ы}н
<neut><intn><s_pl3>     н{ы}>        >{ы}н{Æ}т

<neut><intn><s_sg1><th> м{ы}>        >{ы}гъ{Æ}к
<neut><intn><s_sg3><th> н{ы}>        >{ы}гъ{Æ}н


<neut><cond><s_sg1>     м{ы}>ъ{ы}>        >{ы}к
<neut><cond><s_pl1>     мын{ы}>ъ{ы}>      >{ы}мык
<neut><cond><s_sg2>     н{ы}>ъ{ы}>        >{ы}ги
<neut><cond><s_pl2>     н{ы}>ъ{ы}>        >{ы}тык
<neut><cond><s_sg3>     н{ы}>ъ{ы}>        >{ы}н
<neut><cond><s_pl3>     н{ы}>ъ{ы}>        >{ы}н{Æ}т

<neut><cond><s_sg1><th> м{ы}>ъ{ы}>        >{ы}гъ{Æ}к
<neut><cond><s_sg3><th> н{ы}>ъ{ы}>        >{ы}гъ{Æ}н

<prog><aor><s_sg1>  т{ы}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><aor><s_pl1>  мыт{ы}>  >{ы}ркын
<prog><aor><s_sg2>  :        >{ы}ркын
<prog><aor><s_pl2>  :        >{ы}ркыни>тык
<prog><aor><s_sg3>  :        >{ы}ркын
<prog><aor><s_pl3>  :        >{ы}ркыт

<prog><fut><s_sg1>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><fut><s_pl1>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}ркын
<prog><fut><s_sg2>  р{Æ}>         >{ы}ркын
<prog><fut><s_pl2>  р{Æ}>         >{ы}ркыни>тык
<prog><fut><s_sg3>  р{Æ}>         >{ы}ркын
<prog><fut><s_pl3>  р{Æ}>         >{ы}ркыт

<prog><intn><s_sg1>  м{ы}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><intn><s_pl1>  мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркын
<prog><intn><s_sg2>  ӄ{ы}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><intn><s_pl2>  ӄ{ы}>    >{ы}ркыни>тык
<prog><intn><s_sg3>  н{ы}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><intn><s_pl3>  н{ы}>    >{ы}ркын{Æ}>т

<prog><cond><s_sg1>  м{ы}>ъ{ы}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><cond><s_pl1>  мын{ы}>ъ{ы}>  >{ы}ркын
<prog><cond><s_sg2>  н{ы}>ъ{ы}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><cond><s_pl2>  н{ы}>ъ{ы}>    >{ы}ркыни>тык
<prog><cond><s_sg3>  н{ы}>ъ{ы}>    >{ы}ркын
<prog><cond><s_pl3>  н{ы}>ъ{ы}>    >{ы}ркын{Æ}>т

<stat><perf><s_sg1>  : >{I}гым
<stat><perf><s_pl1>  : >{ы}мури
<stat><perf><s_sg2>  : >{I}гыт
<stat><perf><s_pl2>  : >{ы}тури
<stat><perf><s_sg3>  : >{ы}ԓин
<stat><perf><s_pl3>  : >{ы}ԓин{Æ}т

<stat><hab><s_sg1>  : >{I}гым
<stat><hab><s_pl1>  : >{ы}мури
<stat><hab><s_sg2>  : >{I}гыт
<stat><hab><s_pl2>  : >{ы}тури
<stat><hab><s_sg3>  : >{ы}ӄин
<stat><hab><s_pl3>  : >{ы}ӄин{Æ}т

LEXICON TV(3)
#
#
<neut><aor><a_sg2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >и
<neut><aor><a_sg2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >{ы}гъи
<neut><aor><a_pl2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >{ы}тык
<neut><aor><a_sg3><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >и
<neut><aor><a_sg3><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >{ы}гъи
<neut><aor><a_pl3><o_sg1>   н{Æ}>  >{ы}гым

#
#
<neut><aor><a_sg2><o_pl1>  :      >{ы}ткугъи
<neut><aor><a_pl2><o_pl1>  :      >{ы}ткутык
<neut><aor><a_sg3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>  >{ы}мык
<neut><aor><a_pl3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>  >{ы}мык

<neut><aor><a_sg1><o_sg2>    т{ы}> >{ы}ткугъи
<neut><aor><a_pl1><o_sg2>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}ткутык
#
#
<neut><aor><a_sg3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}гыт
<neut><aor><a_pl3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}гыт

<neut><aor><a_sg1><o_pl2>    т{ы}> >{ы}тык
<neut><aor><a_pl1><o_pl2>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}тык
#
#
<neut><aor><a_sg3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}тык
<neut><aor><a_pl3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}тык

<neut><aor><a_sg1><o_sg3>    т{ы}> >{ы}н
<neut><aor><a_sg1><o_sg3>    т{ы}> >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><aor><a_pl1><o_sg3>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}н
<neut><aor><a_pl1><o_sg3>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><aor><a_sg2><o_sg3>        : >{ы}н
<neut><aor><a_sg2><o_sg3>        : >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><aor><a_pl2><o_sg3>        : >{ы}ткы
<neut><aor><a_sg3><o_sg3>        : >{ы}нин
<neut><aor><a_pl3><o_sg3>    н{Æ}> >{ы}н

<neut><aor><a_sg1><o_pl3>    т{ы}> >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><aor><a_pl1><o_pl3>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><aor><a_sg2><o_pl3>        : >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><aor><a_pl2><o_pl3>        : >{ы}ткы
<neut><aor><a_sg3><o_pl3>        : >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><aor><a_pl3><o_pl3>    н{Æ}> >{ы}н{Æ}т

#
#
<neut><fut><a_sg2><o_sg1>  р{Æ}>ин{Æ}>   >{ы}гъ{Æ}
<neut><fut><a_pl2><o_sg1>  р{Æ}>ин{Æ}>   >{ы}нтык
<neut><fut><a_sg3><o_sg1>  р{Æ}>ин{Æ}>   >{ы}гъ{Æ}
<neut><fut><a_pl3><o_sg1>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}гым

#
#
<neut><fut><a_sg2><o_pl1>  р{Æ}>         >{ы}ткугъ{Æ}
<neut><fut><a_pl2><o_pl1>  р{Æ}>         >{ы}ткунтык
<neut><fut><a_sg3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}мык
<neut><fut><a_pl3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}мык

<neut><fut><a_sg1><o_sg2>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}гыт
<neut><fut><a_pl1><o_sg2>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}гыт
#
#
<neut><fut><a_sg3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}гыт
<neut><fut><a_pl3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}гыт

<neut><fut><a_sg1><o_pl2>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}тык
<neut><fut><a_pl1><o_pl2>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}тык
#
#
<neut><fut><a_sg3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}тык
<neut><fut><a_pl3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}тык

<neut><fut><a_sg1><o_sg3>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈын
<neut><fut><a_pl1><o_sg3>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}ӈын
<neut><fut><a_sg2><o_sg3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈын
<neut><fut><a_pl2><o_sg3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈыткы
<neut><fut><a_sg3><o_sg3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}гнин
<neut><fut><a_pl3><o_sg3>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈын

<neut><fut><a_sg1><o_pl3>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈын{Æ}т
<neut><fut><a_pl1><o_pl3>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}ӈын{Æ}т
<neut><fut><a_sg2><o_pl3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈын{Æ}т
<neut><fut><a_pl2><o_pl3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈыткы
<neut><fut><a_sg3><o_pl3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}гнин{Æ}т
<neut><fut><a_pl3><o_pl3>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ӈын{Æ}т

#
#
<neut><intn><a_sg2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ги
<neut><intn><a_pl2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}тык
<neut><intn><a_sg3><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>н{ы}>  >{ы}н
<neut><intn><a_sg3><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>н{ы}>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><intn><a_pl3><o_sg1>         ыʼн>  >{ы}гым

#
#
<neut><intn><a_sg2><o_pl1>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ткуги
<neut><intn><a_pl2><o_pl1>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ткутык
<neut><intn><a_sg3><o_pl1>         ыʼн>  >{ы}мык
<neut><intn><a_pl3><o_pl1>         ыʼн>  >{ы}мык

<neut><intn><a_sg1><o_sg2>        м{ы}>  >{ы}гыт
<neut><intn><a_pl1><o_sg2>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}гыт
#
#
<neut><intn><a_sg3><o_sg2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}гыт
<neut><intn><a_pl3><o_sg2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}гыт

<neut><intn><a_sg1><o_pl2>        м{ы}>  >{ы}тык
<neut><intn><a_pl1><o_pl2>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}тык
#
#
<neut><intn><a_sg3><o_pl2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}тык
<neut><intn><a_pl3><o_pl2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}тык

<neut><intn><a_sg1><o_sg3>        м{ы}>  >{ы}н
<neut><intn><a_sg1><o_sg3>        м{ы}>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><intn><a_pl1><o_sg3>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}н
<neut><intn><a_pl1><o_sg3>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><intn><a_sg2><o_sg3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гын
<neut><intn><a_pl2><o_sg3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гыткы
<neut><intn><a_sg3><o_sg3>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ӈын
<neut><intn><a_pl3><o_sg3>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ӈын
<neut><intn><a_pl3><o_sg3>         ыʼн>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}ӈын

<neut><intn><a_sg1><o_pl3>        м{ы}>  >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><intn><a_pl1><o_pl3>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><intn><a_sg2><o_pl3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гын{Æ}т
<neut><intn><a_pl2><o_pl3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гыткы
<neut><intn><a_sg3><o_pl3>        н{ы}>  >{ы}нин{Æ}т
<neut><intn><a_pl3><o_pl3>         ыʼн>  >{ы}н{Æ}т

#
#
<neut><cond><a_sg2><o_sg1>       ъ{ы}>ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ги
<neut><cond><a_pl2><o_sg1>       ъ{ы}>ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}тык
<neut><cond><a_sg3><o_sg1>       ъ{ы}>ин{Æ}>н{ы}>  >{ы}н
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_sg1>       ъ{ы}>ин{Æ}>н{ы}>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_sg1>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}гым

#
#
<neut><cond><a_sg2><o_pl1>             ъ{ы}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ткун
<neut><cond><a_sg2><o_pl1>             ъ{ы}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ткугъ{Æ}н
<neut><cond><a_pl2><o_pl1>             ъ{ы}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ткутык
<neut><cond><a_sg3><o_pl1>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}мык
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_pl1>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}мык

<neut><cond><a_sg1><o_sg2>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}гыт
<neut><cond><a_pl1><o_sg2>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}гыт
#
#
<neut><cond><a_sg3><o_sg2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}гыт
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_sg2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}гыт

<neut><cond><a_sg1><o_pl2>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}тык
<neut><cond><a_pl1><o_pl2>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}тык
#
#
<neut><cond><a_sg3><o_pl2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}тык
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_pl2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}тык

<neut><cond><a_sg1><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}н
<neut><cond><a_sg1><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><cond><a_pl1><o_sg3>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}н
<neut><cond><a_pl1><o_sg3>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}н
<neut><cond><a_sg2><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гын
<neut><cond><a_pl2><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гыткы
<neut><cond><a_sg3><o_sg3>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}нин
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_sg3>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ӈын
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_sg3>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}гъ{Æ}ӈын

<neut><cond><a_sg1><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><cond><a_pl1><o_pl3>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}н{Æ}т
<neut><cond><a_sg2><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гын{Æ}т
<neut><cond><a_pl2><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}гыткы
<neut><cond><a_sg3><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}нин{Æ}т
<neut><cond><a_pl3><o_pl3>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}н{Æ}т

#
#
<prog><aor><a_sg2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>
<prog><aor><a_pl2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><aor><a_sg3><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>
<prog><aor><a_pl3><o_sg1>   н{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>гым

#
#
<prog><aor><a_sg2><o_pl1>      :  >ткуркыни{·}>
<prog><aor><a_pl2><o_pl1>      :  >ткуркыни{·}>тык
<prog><aor><a_sg3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>мык
<prog><aor><a_pl3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>мык

<prog><aor><a_sg1><o_sg2>    т{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
<prog><aor><a_pl1><o_sg2>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
#
#
<prog><aor><a_sg3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
<prog><aor><a_pl3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт

<prog><aor><a_sg1><o_pl2>    т{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><aor><a_pl1><o_pl2>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
#
#
<prog><aor><a_sg3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><aor><a_pl3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>   >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык

<prog><aor><a_sg1><o_sg3>    т{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><aor><a_pl1><o_sg3>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><aor><a_sg2><o_sg3>        : >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><aor><a_pl2><o_sg3>        : >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><aor><a_sg3><o_sg3>        : >{ы}ркыни{·}>н
<prog><aor><a_pl3><o_sg3>    н{Æ}> >{ы}ркыни{·}
